Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 201.091, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Public information lists. (a) The county auditor shall make available for inspection a public information list which must contain the name, address, deleted text begin yeardeleted text end new text begin datenew text end of birth, and voting history of each registered voter in the county. Data on applicants submitted pursuant to section 201.061, subdivision 1b, are not part of the public information list until the voter is registered or has voting history. The list must not include the party choice of any voter who voted in a presidential nomination primary. The telephone number must be included on the list if provided by the voter. The public information list may also include information on voting districts. The county auditor may adopt reasonable rules governing access to the list. (b) No individual inspecting the public information list shall tamper with or alter it in any manner. No individual who inspects the public information list or who acquires a list of registered voters prepared from the public information list may use any information contained in the list for purposes unrelated to elections, political activities, or law enforcement. The secretary of state may provide copies of the public information lists and other information from the statewide registration system for uses related to elections, political activities, or in response to a law enforcement inquiry from a public official concerning a failure to comply with any criminal statute or any state or local tax statute. (c) Before inspecting the public information list or obtaining a list of voters or other information from the list, the individual shall provide identification to the public official having custody of the public information list and shall state in writing that any information obtained from the list will not be used for purposes unrelated to elections, political activities, or law enforcement. Requests to examine or obtain information from the public information lists or the statewide registration system must be made and processed in the manner provided in the rules of the secretary of state. (d) Upon receipt of a statement signed by the voter that withholding the voter's name from the public information list is required for the safety of the voter or the voter's family, the secretary of state and county auditor must withhold from the public information list the name of a registered voter. (e) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b) and (c) and regardless of the purpose of the publication, a recipient of a public information list must not: (1) publish any of the information from the list on the Internet on any list, database, or other similar searchable format; or (2) sell, loan, provide access to, or otherwise surrender any information obtained from the list to any person or entity, except that an individual who obtains the public information list on behalf of an organization, entity, or political subdivision may distribute the information to the organization's, entity's, or political subdivision's volunteers or employees for purposes related to elections, political activities, or law enforcement in the case where the information is provided in response to a law enforcement inquiry from a public official concerning a failure to comply with any criminal statute or any state or local tax statute. Nothing in this section prohibits the preparation, use, or transfer, for purposes related to elections or political activities, of a database that includes data obtained from the public information list which is aggregated with data obtained from other sources provided that such database is used exclusively for purposes related to elections or political activities and no information from the list is published on the Internet. The prohibitions of this paragraph do not apply if the subject of the information provides express written permission to use the subject's data in a manner otherwise prohibited by this paragraph. For purposes of this paragraph, "publish" means information is made available to the general public. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 201.091, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Restricted data. A list provided for public inspection or purchase, or in response to a law enforcement inquiry, must not include deleted text begin a voter's date of birth ordeleted text end any part of a voter's Social Security number, driver's license number, identification card number, military identification card number, or passport number. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end